District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2416

Refusal to grant license; cancellation, revocation, or suspension; grounds

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(d), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1801 to 2-1822.